Missouri, session 2026, HB1781.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 21.110, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 21.110, to read as follows:
21.110. 1. If the governor receives any resignation or notice of vacancy, or if he or
she is [satisfied] notified of the death of any member of either house, [during the recess], he
or she shall[, without delay,] issue a writ of election to [supply] fill the vacancy. If the
vacancy occurs forty-six weeks or more before the end of the term, the governor shall
issue the writ within seven days of receiving notice of the vacancy and the election shall
be held on or before the eighteenth Tuesday following the issuance of the writ.
2. If the vacancy occurs less than forty-six weeks before the end of the term, the
governor shall have discretion to issue the writ.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.